Arkansas, session 2025, SB467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-710(a)(1), as amended by § 1 of Acts
2025, No. 266, concerning the definition of "healthcare provider" relating to
student athlete concussion education, is amended to read as follows:
(1) "Healthcare provider" means an allopathic or osteopathic
physician, neuropsychologist, chiropractor or chiropractic physician,
advanced practice registered nurse, certified athletic trainer, physician
assistant, or physical therapist; and






*JMB401*
03/16/2025 10:16:54 AM JMB401